District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.89

Commencement of action for involuntary dissolution; summons; notice.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 217, ch. 269, § 89
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 589, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 168(c)(2)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.89.
1981 Ed., § 29-389.
1973 Ed., § 29-931a.